Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 41. Financing Industrial Enterprise Projects

§ 57-41-1.
Definitions.

Wherever used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears in the context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall be given the following respective interpretations:

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city, town or village in the State of Mississippi;

“Project” means land, buildings, improvements, fixtures, machinery, equipment and furnishings, and all real and personal properties deemed necessary in connection therewith, or any part or combination of parts of the foregoing, whether or not now in existence, which shall be suitable for use by any industrial enterprise;

“Industrial enterprise” means a person, corporation, partnership or other legal entity authorized by law to engage in the business of manufacturing, processing or assembling any products of agriculture, mining or industry, excluding retail businesses;

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the legislative powers of the municipality are vested;

“Mortgage” means a mortgage, indenture of trust, deed of trust or any other instrument securing notes of an industrial enterprise;

“Loan agreement” means an agreement providing for the governing body to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of notes pursuant to this chapter to one or more industrial enterprises to be used to pay the cost of one or more projects and providing for the repayment of such loans by the industrial enterprises, and which shall provide for such loans to be evidenced by one or more notes, and secured by a mortgage delivered to the municipality or to the assignee of the municipality’s rights under the loan agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-3.
General powers of governing bodies.

The governing body is hereby granted the following powers, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those hereinafter stated, in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter:

To enter into loan agreements with an industrial enterprise with respect to one or more projects for such payments and upon such terms and conditions as the governing body may deem advisable in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

To borrow money and issue its notes for the purpose of making loans to industrial enterprises to finance one or more projects; however, no loan shall exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) for any one (1) project;

As security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any notes so issued, to assign and pledge all or any part of its interest in and rights under the loan agreements relating thereto to financial institutions purchasing the notes, together with all notes and deeds of trust delivered to the municipality pursuant thereto.

The powers conferred upon the governing body of a municipality under this chapter may be exercised only after the governing body has obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Mississippi Board of Economic Development for each project of an industrial enterprise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-5.
Issuance, terms and conditions of notes; validation of bonds.

The principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on the notes of the municipality shall be payable solely out of, and shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts derived from the industrial enterprise as designated in the proceedings of the governing body under which the notes shall be authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the industrial enterprises obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project, and from such other sources available to the municipality as may be designated by the governing body in its proceedings in connection with the issuance of the notes. Such notes may be executed and delivered by the governing body at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations, may be subject to such terms of redemption, may mature at such time or times not exceeding ten (10) years; and may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registrable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times, may be payable at such place or places, whether within or without the State of Mississippi, may bear interest irrespective of any interest rate limitation, payable at such time or times, and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the governing body whereunder the notes shall be authorized to be issued.

Any notes of the governing body may be sold at public or private sale. The governing body may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which its governing body may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof, but solely from the proceeds of the notes. Bonds issued hereunder shall be validated in the manner provided by law in the chancery court of the county in which the municipality is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 453, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 33; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 57-41-7.
Security for notes.

The notes may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the municipality and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of any state in the United States. Any such trust agreement may pledge or assign income, contract payments, fees or any other revenues and receipts to be received from an industrial enterprise, whether or not related to a project. The notes may be additionally secured by an assignment of a mortgage, deed of trust or other security interest upon all or any part of one or more projects, including any enlargements of and additions to a project, vesting in the trustee power to sell such project for the payment of indebtedness, power to operate a project and all other powers and authority and for the further security of the notes.

Any trust agreement made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may contain a provision that, in the event of a default in the payment of the principal of, redemption premium, if any, or the interest on the notes issued in accordance with, or relating to, such agreement, or in the performance of any agreement contained in the proceedings, trust agreement or instruments relating to such notes, such payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with power to charge and collect rates, rents or payments and to apply the revenues from the project in accordance with such proceedings, trust agreement or instruments.

Any mortgage or deed of trust to secure notes issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may also provide that in the event of a default in the payment thereof or the violation of any agreement contained in the mortgage or deed of trust, the property secured by the mortgage or deed of trust may be foreclosed and sold under proceedings in equity or in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law. Such mortgage or deed of trust may also provide that any trustee under such mortgage or deed of trust or the holder of any of the notes secured thereby, may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if it is the highest bidder therefor.

The notes may be additionally secured by a guaranty agreement from an industrial enterprise to the trustee or to the holder of any note or by such other guaranty agreement, letter of credit or other arrangement as shall be acceptable to the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-9.
Sources for payment of notes; liability of municipality; negotiability of notes.

All notes issued by a municipality under authority of this chapter shall be limited obligations of the municipality, the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on which shall be payable solely from revenues received by the municipality pursuant to the loan agreement or pursuant to notes and deeds of trust delivered to the municipality and from such other funds as may be made available to the municipality for such purpose by the terms of the trust agreement. Notes issued under authority of this chapter shall never constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation, and shall never constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such fact shall be plainly stated on the face of each such note. The notes shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness of the municipality established by law. All notes issued under the authority of this chapter shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that they are payable solely from a specified source.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-11.
Investment in notes.

Notes issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for commercial banks, savings and loan associations and insurance companies organized under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-13.
Exemption from taxation of notes; limitations on exemption of industrial enterprises from taxation.

The notes authorized by this chapter and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi, and the revenue derived by the issuer from the project shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. Any industrial enterprise shall not be exempt from ad valorem taxes on the project, except as is otherwise provided in Section 27-31-101 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, nor shall purchases required to establish projects and financed by note proceeds be exempt from taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-15.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the issuance of the aforesaid notes, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds, notes or other obligations by municipalities in this state shall apply to the issuance and sale of notes under this chapter, and no proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such notes other than those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 57-41-17.
Adoption of rules and regulations.

The Mississippi Board of Economic Development is authorized and empowered to adopt and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter not inconsistent therewith, including, but not limited to, eligible costs of a project and the financing thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 463, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1981.